District of Columbia statutes.
31-5722

Repealed

Separation of fraternal and insurance activities; corporations affected.

Repealed.

Apr. 12, 1930, 46 Stat. 158, ch. 135, § 1
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(o), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86,§ 1237(c), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1222.
1973 Ed., § 35-922.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5702.